src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
kojaduz+N:kojaduz N_ALUZ  "kaiku" ;
nado+N:nado N_NADO  "nato" ;
noruzʼ+N:norud N_NORUZ  "nuoruus" ;
vedäi+N:vedäi N_VEDÄI  "johtaja" ;
veps+N:veps N_VEPS  "vepsä" ;
vozʼ+N:vod N_NORUZ  "vuosi" ;
käzi+N:käd N_KEZI  "käsi" ;
